Utah statutes.
10-1-302.   Purpose and intent.

The Legislature finds that:

(1)  the energy industry has previously been highly regulated and monopolistic;

(2)  municipalities have historically raised general fund revenues by collecting franchise and business license revenues from the energy industry;

(3)  substantial restructuring of the energy industry has created an opportunity for increased competition within the energy industry;

(4)  the restructuring of the energy industry has diminished the effectiveness and fairness of the revenues collected by municipalities;

(5)  to provide for a stable revenue source for municipalities and to create a more competitive environment for the energy industry, it is necessary to enact taxing authority for municipalities that accomplishes those goals; and

(6)  this part does not alter or affect the municipalities' authority to grant or regulate franchises, or to control municipal streets, highways, or other property.

